Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.210

Robbery in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of robbery in the second degree if he or she commits robbery.

(2) Robbery in the second degree is a class B felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 380; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.210.]